Maine, session 132, LD70.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the State's free health clinics. The funding is to be
distributed based on a formula adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services
using the number of clients served and a base amount for each clinic.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Page 1 - 132LR0017(06)